Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8118.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-28.6-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-28.6 entitled "Law
Enforcement Officers’ Due Process, Accountability, and Transparency Act" is hereby amended to
read as follows:
42-28.6-1. Definitions — Payment of legal fees.
As used in this chapter, the following words have the meanings indicated:
(1) “Course of training in police discipline” means a course or courses of instruction
approved by the Rhode Island police officers commission on standards and training
(“commission”) which shall be taught by instructors approved by the commission regarding the
provisions of this chapter and the applicable procedure, evidence and rules that apply to police
discipline as provided pursuant to § 42-28.6-1.2.
(2) “Hearing” means any meeting in the course of an investigatory proceeding, other than
an interrogation at which no testimony is taken under oath, conducted by a hearing committee for
the purpose of taking or adducing testimony or receiving evidence.
(3)(i) “Hearing committee” means a committee acting as a deliberative body which is
authorized to hold a hearing on a complaint against a law enforcement officer and which consists
of five (5) members: one member appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court who shall be
a retired justice or judge of the supreme, superior, or district court; one member appointed by the
chief justice of the supreme court, who is a practicing attorney in good standing with the supreme

court, in consultation with the court’s committee on racial and ethnic fairness and the Rhode Island
Bar Association and its committee on diversity, equity, and inclusion; and three (3) active or retired
qualified law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the state police or a municipal law
enforcement agency from within the state of Rhode Island, who shall be selected at random by the
Rhode Island police officers commission on standards and training from the certified officer pool
established pursuant to § 42-28.6-1.1 at an open meeting pursuant to chapter 46 of this title. No law
enforcement officer shall be selected that is employed by or retired from the same law enforcement
agency that employs the accused law enforcement officer or who is employed by or retired from
the charging law enforcement agency. The retired justice or judge appointed by the chief justice of
the supreme court shall serve as chairperson of the hearing committee. Upon written application by
a majority of the hearing committee, the chairperson, in their discretion, may also appoint legal
counsel to assist the hearing committee.
(ii) The law enforcement agency and the accused law enforcement officer under
investigation shall each be responsible to pay fifty percent (50%) of the legal fee of the appointed
legal counsel for the hearing committee; provided, however, that on motion made by either party,
the chair of the hearing committee shall have the authority to make a different disposition as to
what each party is required to pay toward the appointed legal counsel’s legal fee. Upon written
application by both the law enforcement agency and the accused law enforcement officer, the
chairperson, in their discretion, may also appoint legal counsel to assist the hearing committee. In
such cases, the law enforcement agency and the accused law enforcement officer shall each be
responsible to pay fifty percent (50%) of the legal fee of the appointed legal counsel for the hearing
committee, unless otherwise agreed upon.
(4) “Law enforcement officer” means any permanently employed city or town police
officer, state police officer, permanent law enforcement officer of the department of environmental
management, or those employees of the airport corporation of Rhode Island who have been granted
the authority to arrest by the president and CEO of said corporation. However this shall not include
the chief of police and/or the highest ranking sworn officer of any of the departments including the
president and CEO of the airport corporation of Rhode Island.
(5) “Qualified law enforcement officer” means:
(i) A sworn law enforcement officer who:
(A) Has a minimum of five (5) years’ active service as a law enforcement officer with a
law enforcement agency within the state;
(B) Has successfully completed a course(s) of training in police discipline pursuant to this
chapter and has maintained a current certification of completed training; and
LC005452 - Page 2 of 4

(C) Has not achieved the rank of chief, colonel, deputy chief, or lieutenant colonel;
(ii) A retired law enforcement officer who has qualified prior to retirement or during
retirement and has met the criteria set out herein.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005452
========
LC005452 - Page 3 of 4